California statutes. Public Resources Code
“Campfire” means a fire which is used for cooking, personal warmth, lighting, ceremonial, or aesthetic purposes, including fires contained within outdoor fireplaces and enclosed stoves with flues or chimneys, stoves using jellied, liquid, solid, or gaseous fuels, portable barbecue pits and braziers, or space heating devices which are used outside any structure, mobilehome, or living accommodation mounted on a motor vehicle. “Campfire” does not include portable lanterns designed to emit light resulting from a combustion process.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

4104.

The term “uncontrolled fire,” as used in this division, means any fire which threatens to destroy life, property, or resources and either: (1) is unattended by any person; (2) is attended by persons unable to prevent its unrestricted spread; or (3) is burning with such velocity or intensity that it could not be readily controlled with those ordinary tools available to private persons at the fire scene.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 525, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 525.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [4111. - 4123.8.]

4111.

The board shall make and enforce such regulations as are necessary and proper for the organization, maintenance, government, and direction of the fire protective system for the prevention and suppression of forest fires which is provided for in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4112.

The department shall divide the state into a suitable and convenient number of administrative districts and shall appoint a supervising forest officer for each district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4113.

The supervising forest officers shall, under the direction of the director, have charge of the firefighting system and men in such districts, and are charged with the duty of preventing and extinguishing forest fires and with the performance of such other duties as may be required by the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4114.

(a) The department, in accordance with a plan approved by the board, shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide fire prevention and firefighting implements and apparatus.

(2) Organize fire crews and patrols.

(3) Establish observation stations and other necessary structures.

(4) Employ people to effect the plan.

(5) Construct and maintain telephone lines and provide other means of communication as necessary to prevent and extinguish forest fires.

(b) The department may provide, when available and to the extent that it does not require additional funds, rescue, first aid, and other emergency services to the public in state responsibility areas. Any emergency medical services shall be in accordance with Division 2.5 (commencing with Section 1797) of the Health and Safety Code and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant to that division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 194, Sec. 1.   Effective July 23, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

4114.1.

(a) Subject to an appropriation of funds for this purpose, the department shall begin to employ sufficient permanent firefighting personnel to increase the base period staffing levels.

(b) The department shall maintain the ability to hire seasonal, temporary firefighters as needed to allow for surge hiring capacity for confronting emergency fire conditions or other personnel shortages as determined by the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 106, Sec. 11.   (AB 149)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4114.3.

(a) (1) The department shall actively engage University of California Cooperative Extension, relevant California State Universities, fire safe councils, California Native American tribes, tribal organizations, cultural fire practitioners, resource conservation districts, and any other entity with demonstrated expertise to enhance its public education efforts regarding any of the following:

(A) Restoring fire processes and functions.

(B) Cultural burning.

(C) Fire prevention.

 (D) Public safety.

(2) These public education efforts shall include, but are not limited to, educational activities regarding community wildfire protection plans, community fire safe councils, community and private chipping days, defensible space, prescribed fires, cultural burning, hardened residences, compliance with building standards, evacuation routes, activities that promote fire resiliency or achieve carbon-sequestration benefits in the wildland-urban interface and other forest lands, and activities that promote public safety. When engaging with Native American tribes, tribal organizations, and cultural fire practitioners, the department shall respect tribal sovereignty, customs, and culture.

(b) The department shall also support, to the extent feasible, the programs of California Native American tribes, tribal organizations, and cultural fire practitioners that develop the knowledge and skills needed to establish and maintain the diverse
 workforce that is required to achieve activities described in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 375, Sec. 9.   (AB 642)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4114.4.

(a) (1) On or before January 1, 2026, the department, in coordination with the United States Forest Service and other relevant state, federal, tribal, local, and private cooperators, shall identify and map a comprehensive network of potential operational delineations that can be used for strategic wildfire response or the proactive use of prescribed fire. This effort shall use existing tools, including, but not limited to, open-source tools, and build on existing plans, including, but not limited to, community wildfire protection plans, CAL-FIRE unit fire plans, and potential operational delineations for wildfires of the United States Forest Service.

(2) The map described in paragraph (1) shall comply with both of the
 following:

(A) Be included in outreach efforts for state programs related to fire planning and community engagement efforts, such as, but not limited to, the Regional Forest and Fire Capacity Program (Article 11 (commencing with Section 4208)).

(B) Be assessed for potential impacts on tribal cultural resources and sensitive species in areas where there will be significant ground disturbance. The department, through local units of the department, shall engage with and consult tribal entities in the region for input on the potential network of delineations described in paragraph (1). Tribal leadership in this process shall be supported and engaged with to the extent feasible. If an appropriation by the Legislature has been made for these purposes, state resources may be used to support tribal engagement in developing, reviewing, and assessing proposed locations. This subparagraph
 does not alter any duty by the department to consult with tribal governments during a wildfire event.

(b) (1) In order to provide a nuanced understanding of postfire conditions, on or before July 1, 2025, and updated annually thereafter, the Fire and Resource Assessment Program in the department shall develop maps of the severity of impacts from wildfires that includes fires of significant size across all land ownerships. To the extent feasible, in developing the maps described in this paragraph, the department shall collaborate with the United States Forest Service, the United States Geological Survey, and other relevant parties, and shall, where appropriate, use data from existing sources, including from the Burn Severity Portal maintained by the United States Geological Survey. For purposes of complying with this paragraph, the department may contract with a third party. 

(2) The department shall make the maps described in paragraph (1) available to the public on its internet website.

(c) The department shall annually review the effects of recent fires in the context of community safety and ecological restoration goals to identify priority opportunities for prescribed fire that can further manage hazardous fuel conditions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 778, Sec. 4.   (SB 1101)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4114.5.

(a) A contract with a nonpublic entity entered into by the department that includes a provision for the services of pilots to fly firefighting aircraft owned by, or on loan to, the department for the purpose of fighting fire shall expressly provide that, if the pilot dies while performing the duties specified in the contract, eligible survivors, if any, of the pilot shall be paid a one-time death benefit by the department equal to the sum of the following:

(1) The amount of the one-time benefit that the eligible survivors of the pilot would receive if the pilot were subject to the federal Public Safety Officers’ Death Benefits Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3796 et seq.). This paragraph shall
 not be applicable if, at the time of the pilot’s death, the eligible survivors of the pilot are entitled to benefits under that act.

(2) An amount, as determined by the department, that would be commensurate with the death benefit payable to a mid-career firefighter employed by the department who died in the line of duty.

(b) The benefits payable pursuant to any contract subject to this section shall be paid to eligible survivors in a lump sum as follows:

(1) If there is no eligible child, to the surviving spouse.

(2) If there is an eligible child or children and a surviving spouse, one-half to the child or to the children in equal shares and one-half to the
 surviving spouse.

(3) If there is no surviving spouse and there is an eligible child or children, to the eligible child or in equal shares to the eligible children.

(4) If there is no surviving spouse nor any eligible child or children, to the surviving parent or in equal shares to the surviving parents.

(c) If there are no eligible survivors, no benefit shall be payable and a pilot may not otherwise designate a beneficiary to receive the benefits under the contract.

(d) (1) As used in this section, an “eligible survivor” means the surviving spouse, eligible children, or surviving parents of the deceased pilot.

(2) “Surviving spouse” means a spouse who was married to the pilot at the time of the pilot’s death.

(3) “Eligible child” means an unmarried, natural child of the deceased pilot who (A) was born before or after the death of the pilot or is an adopted child or stepchild of the pilot, and (B) is 18 years of age or younger at the time of the pilot’s death, or over the age of 18 years and incapable of self-support due to a physical or mental disability, or between 18 and 22 years of age and pursuing a full-time course of study or training, if the child has not already completed four years of
 education beyond high school.

(e) This section shall be applicable irrespective of whether the department contracts directly with the pilot or contracts with a third party that employs or contracts with pilots.

(f) Nothing in this section relieves the pilot’s employer from the obligation to secure coverage for workers’ compensation; eliminates or reduces any workers’ compensation benefits otherwise available; or affects, alters, or eliminates any other remedy otherwise available at law.

(g) This section does not apply to a pilot who dies while performing duties in a firefighting aircraft that is owned by the pilot or another entity other than the department pursuant to a contract or agreement with the department, except
 for a firefighting aircraft on loan to the department pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 50.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4115.

In providing communications, telecommunications, and necessary powerlines in connection with the prevention and extinguishment of forest fires, the department, with the approval of the Department of General Services, may enter into contracts with the owners of real property for the use of their lands or facilities in locations where no other state tenant exists or to install portable or single use remote telecommunications facilities. Provision may be made for indemnification and holding harmless of the owners of those facilities which are so used by reason of that use. Insurance may be purchased by the Department of General Services, upon request of the department, to protect the state against loss or expense arising out of a contract entered into pursuant to this
 section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 306, Sec. 5.   (AB 2544)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4116.

Any claim for damages arising against the state under Section 4114 or 4115 shall be presented to the Department of General Services in accordance with Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code and, if not covered by insurance, shall be payable only out of funds appropriated by the Legislature for that purpose. If the state has elected to acquire liability insurance, the Department of General Services may automatically deny this claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 268.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4117.

Any county, city, or district may adopt ordinances, rules, or regulations to provide fire prevention restrictions or regulations that are necessary to meet local conditions of weather, vegetation, or other fire hazards. Such ordinances, rules, or regulations may be more restrictive than state statutes in order to meet local fire hazard conditions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4118.

The burning of growing, dead, or downed vegetation is for a public purpose if the department has determined that the burning of such vegetation is necessary for the prevention or suppression of forest fires.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4119.

The department, or its duly authorized agent, shall enforce the state forest and fire laws. The department may inspect all properties, except the interior of dwellings, subject to the state forest and fire laws, for the purpose of ascertaining compliance with such laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4120.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code or of law and except as provided in the State Building Standards Law, Part 2.5 (commencing with Section 18901) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code, on and after January 1, 1980, the director, the department, or the State Forester shall not adopt nor publish a building standard as defined in Section 18909 of the Health and Safety Code unless the provisions of Sections 18930, 18933, 18938, 18940, 18943, 18944, and 18945 of the Health and Safety Code are expressly excepted in the statute under which the authority to adopt rules, regulations, or orders is delegated. Any building standard adopted in violation of this section shall have no force or effect. Any building standard adopted before January 1, 1980, pursuant to this code and not expressly excepted by statute from such provisions of the State Building Standards Law shall remain in effect only until January 1, 1985, or until adopted, amended, or superseded by provisions published in the State Building Standards Code, whichever occurs sooner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1152.)
-------------------------------------------

4123.

When selecting a fuel reduction project, the department shall collaborate with the State Water Resources Control Board, the California Geological Survey, and the Department of Fish and Wildlife to ensure the design of the fuel reduction project protects water resources and wildlife habitat while addressing fire behavior and public safety.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 236, Sec. 16.   (SB 831)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4123.5.

(a) The department shall create the Wildfire Resilience Program. The purpose of the program is to assist nonindustrial timberland owners with wildfire resilience efforts by providing technical assistance on multiple topics, including, but not necessarily limited to, helping navigate the permitting process, fuels reduction, fuelbreaks, forest health, and reforestation, for purposes of reducing wildlife risks while maintaining or enhancing habitat, watershed values, and carbon sequestration. This technical assistance shall be provided by department staff and in collaboration with other entities, including, but not necessarily limited to, resource conservation districts and the University of California Cooperative Extension.

(b) The department may
 use any mechanisms or tools to determine priority areas, including high or very high fire threat zones as described by the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection’s Fire Hazard Severity Zone map, in a Public Utilities Commission-designated Tier 2 or Tier 3 High Fire Threat District, or in the state responsibility areas where wildfire resilience activities are necessary and serve an important purpose. Where appropriate, the department and its collaborators may conduct outreach efforts to nonindustrial timberland owners in priority areas to provide information and technical assistance.

(c) To provide the technical assistance referenced in subdivision (a), the department may use its forestry assistant specialists or any other personnel classification with the knowledge to inform nonindustrial timberland owners of the options to make their timberland more resilient to wildfire and to take advantage of the other provisions of subdivision (a),
 with specific outreach on these topics to those nonindustrial timberland owners.

(d) The department shall assist nonindustrial timberland owners by making all of the following information available:

(1) A list of permits needed from state entities to conduct various types of fuel removal projects.

(2) Concise information detailing research and current best practices for wildfire resilience.

(3) A list of the grant opportunities statewide which allow for wildfire resilience activities.

(4) The details of grants made by the department relating to wildfire resilience activities.

(e) The department shall provide technical
 assistance to nonindustrial timberland owners on how to maintain the benefits of fuel reduction projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 626, Sec. 5.   (SB 901)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4123.7.

(a) On or before July 1, 2021, the Natural Resources Agency, in consultation with the State Fire Marshal and the Forest Management Task Force, shall review the regional capacity of each county that contains a very high fire hazard severity zone, as identified by the director pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code or Article 9 (commencing with Section 4201), to improve forest health, fire resilience, and safety. The review shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Identification of local or regional entities engaged in fire prevention work, such as resource conservation districts, fire safe councils, state conservancies, and other local agencies.

(2) A review of fire prevention organizational or capacity deficits within each county subject to the review.

(3) Recommendations to improve regional capacity and collaboration within the counties subject to review, including, but not limited to, the development of new organizations or regional districts.

(b) The Natural Resources Agency shall make the review required pursuant to subdivision (a) publicly available on its internet website.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 391, Sec. 5.   (AB 38)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4123.8.

(a) On or before January 1, 2026, the department, in consultation with the State Air Resources Board and the Wildfire and Forest Resilience Task Force, shall report to the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature on funds spent pursuant to Section 45 of Senate Bill 901 (Chapter 626, Statutes of 2018). The report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information:

(1) The outcomes of the projects implemented, including, but not limited to, a description of the benefits for public safety, fire prevention, habitat, climate resiliency, and protection of important natural resources, including water quality and water supply.

(2) A description of the
 projected greenhouse gas emission and carbon sequestration impacts for the year of implementation of a project and for administering programs based on the State Air Resources Board’s forest health quantification methodology.

(3) Recommendations for modifying the forest health grant program, established pursuant to Section 4799.05, and the local assistance grant program, established pursuant to Section 4124.5, to improve outcomes, benefits, durability of benefits, and statewide benefits.

(4) An assessment of the potential benefits, including unmet need, for continuing the commitment made pursuant to Section 45 of Senate Bill 901 (Chapter 626, Statutes of 2018).

(b) The department shall appear yearly before the appropriate legislative committees, including the Assembly Committee on Natural Resources, the Senate
 Committee on Natural Resources and Water, and appropriate budget subcommittees to provide information on the outcomes of projects completed under Section 45 of Senate Bill 901 (Chapter 626 of the Statutes of 2018).

(c) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2030.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 382, Sec. 7.   (SB 63)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Fire Prevention Grants Program [4124. - 4124.8.]

4124.

For the purposes of this article, “fire prevention activities” means those lawful activities that reduce the risk of wildfire in California, including, but not limited to, mechanical vegetation management, prescribed grazing, prescribed burns, creation of defensible space, and retrofitting of structures to increase fire resistance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 519, Sec. 2.   (AB 297)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4124.5.

(a) The department shall establish a local assistance grant program for fire prevention and home hardening education activities in California. Groups eligible for grants shall include, but are not limited to, local agencies, resource conservation districts, fire safe councils, the California Conservation Corps, certified community conservation corps as defined in Section 14507.5, University of California Cooperative Extension, the Board of Commissioners under CaliforniaVolunteers described in Section 8411 of the Government Code, Native American tribes, and qualified nonprofit organizations. The department may establish a cost-share requirement for one or more categories of projects.

(b) (1) The local assistance grant program shall establish a
 robust year-round fire prevention effort in and near fire-threatened communities that focuses on increasing the protection of people, structures, and communities. To the maximum extent practicable, the grants shall be designed to be durable and adaptively managed so that while improving resiliency to wildfire, the projects, when on forest land, retain a mixture of species and sizes of trees to protect habitat values. The department shall prioritize, to the extent feasible, projects that are multiyear efforts.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “fire-threatened communities” means those communities in high and very high fire hazard severity zones, identified by the State Fire Marshal pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code, or Article 9 (commencing with Section 4201) of this code, or on the “Fire Risk Reduction Community” list maintained by the board pursuant to Section 4290.1.

(c) Eligible activities shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Development and implementation of public education and outreach programs. Programs may include technical assistance, new technologies, game elements to enhance and accelerate the education of property owners, workforce recruitment and training, and equipment purchases.

(2) Fire prevention activities as defined in Section 4124.

(3) Projects to improve compliance with defensible space requirements as required by Section 4291 through increased inspections, assessments, and assistance for
 residents with relevant socioeconomic characteristics, as defined in Section 8654.7 of the Government Code.

(4) Technical assistance to local agencies to improve fire prevention and reduce fire hazards.

(5) Creation of additional “Firewise USA” communities in the state or other community planning or certification programs deemed as appropriate by the department.

(6) Projects to improve public safety, including, but not limited to, access to emergency equipment and improvements to public evacuation routes.

(7) Vegetation management along roadways and driveways to reduce fire risk. Where appropriate, the Department of Transportation shall be consulted if state infrastructure will be affected. Those projects shall
 remain consistent with paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(8) Public education outreach regarding making homes and communities more wildfire resilient, including training on defensible space and prescribed grazing.

(9) Projects to reduce the flammability of structures and communities to prevent their ignition from wind-driven embers.

(10) Development of a risk reduction checklist for communities that includes defensible space criteria, structural vulnerability potential, and personal evacuation plans.

(11) (A) Projects involving the application of prescribed grazing, which may include the installation of fencing or watering improvements.

(B) Watering improvements described in subparagraph (A) shall not include the creation of a well or replacement of well infrastructure.

(d) The department may consider the fire risk of an area, the geographic balance of projects, and whether the project is complementary to other fire prevention or forest health activities when awarding local assistance grants.

(e) When reviewing applications for the grant program created pursuant to this section, the department shall give priority to any local governmental entity qualified to perform defensible space assessments pursuant to Section 4291.5 in very high and high fire hazard severity zones, as identified by the State Fire Marshal pursuant to Section 51178 of the
 Government Code or Article 9 (commencing with Section 4201) of this chapter or by a local agency pursuant to Section 51179 of the Government Code, for using the common reporting platform created pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 4291.5 to report that information.

(f) (1) The director may authorize advance payments from a grant awarded pursuant to this section. The advance payment shall not exceed 25 percent of the total grant award. The director may authorize a greater amount, not to exceed 50 percent of either the total grant award or the cost of equipment or supplies, whichever amount is less, for the purpose of
 purchasing necessary equipment or supplies.

(2) The grantee shall expend the funds from the advance payment within six months of receipt, unless the department waives this requirement.

(3) The grantee shall file an accountability report with the department no later than six months from the date of receiving the funds and
 no later than every six months thereafter.

(g) Until July 1, 2025, the department may authorize advance payments on a grant awarded under this section in accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 11019.1 of the Government Code.

(h) The department may expand or amend an existing grant program to
 meet the requirements of this section.

(i) Funding for the local assistance grant program created pursuant to this section shall be made upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 982, Sec. 3.5.   (SB 504)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4124.6.

(a) On or before January 31, 2022, the director shall hold a public workshop to do all of the following:

(1) Review activities funded by the local assistance grant program established in Section 4124.5 and program outcomes, and discuss and recommend possible improvements to the program.

(2) Identify new sources and methods of financing fire prevention activities.

(3) Review new activities or methods of fire prevention that could protect life and property including, but not limited to, the prevention of high wind grass fires.

(b) (1) The department shall report a summary of the findings of the public workshop to the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature on or before July 1, 2022. The department shall include in the report any recommendations it has developed for improving the local assistance grant program established in Section 4124.5, for consideration by the Legislature.

(2) The requirement for submitting a report
 imposed under paragraph (1) is inoperative on July 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 632, Sec. 3.   (AB 1956)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4124.7.

(a) The department shall, except for activities described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 4124.5, prioritize local assistance grant funding applications from local agencies based on the “Fire Risk Reduction Community” list, upon development of that list, pursuant to Section 4290.1.

(b) The prioritization required in subdivision (a) shall not affect applications from entities that are not local agencies.

(c) This section shall become operative only if Assembly Bill 1956 of the 2017–18 Regular Session is chaptered and becomes effective on or before January 1, 2019.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 626, Sec. 6.   (SB 901)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Note: Operational condition  in subd (c) satisfied.)
-------------------------------------------

4124.8.

On or before June 1, 2022, all of the duties and responsibilities for the local assistance grant program established pursuant to this article shall be transferred to the Office of the State Fire Marshal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 225, Sec. 12.   (AB 9)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Responsibility for Fire Protection [4125. - 4137.]

4125.

(a) The board shall classify all lands within the state, without regard to any classification of lands made by or for any federal agency or purpose, for the purpose of determining areas in which the financial responsibility of preventing and suppressing fires is primarily the responsibility of the state. The prevention and suppression of fires in all areas that are not so classified is primarily the responsibility of local or federal agencies, as the case may be.

(b) On or before July 1, 1991, and every 5th year thereafter, the department shall provide copies of maps identifying the boundaries of lands classified as state responsibility pursuant to subdivision (a) to the county assessor for every county containing any of those lands. The department shall also notify county assessors of any changes to state responsibility areas within the county resulting from periodic boundary modifications approved by the board.

(c) A notice shall be posted at the offices of the county recorder, county assessor, and county planning agency that identifies the location of the map, and of any information received by the county subsequent to the receipt of the map regarding changes to state responsibility areas within the county.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 380) by Stats. 1998, Ch. 65, Sec. 15.   Effective June 9, 1998.   Applicable from June 1, 1998, by Sec. 18 of Ch. 65.   Note: Ch. 65 (pursuant to Sec. 20) supersedes, and precludes operation of, Stats. 1997, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

4126.

The board shall include within state responsibility areas all of the following lands:

(a) Lands covered wholly or in part by forests or by trees producing or capable of producing forest products.

(b) Lands covered wholly or in part by timber, brush, undergrowth, or grass, whether of commercial value or not, which protect the soil from excessive erosion, retard runoff of water or accelerate water percolation, if such lands are sources of water which is available for irrigation or for domestic or industrial use.

(c) Lands in areas which are principally used or useful for range or forage purposes, which are contiguous to the lands described in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4127.

The board shall not include within state responsibility areas any of the following lands:

(a) Lands owned or controlled by the federal government or any agency of the federal government. 

(b) Lands within the exterior boundaries of any city, except a city and county with a population of less than 25,000 if, at the time the city and county government is established, the county contains no municipal corporations. 

(c) Any other lands within the state which do not come within any of the classes which are described in Section 4126.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 653, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4128.

In establishing boundaries of state responsibility areas, the board may, for purposes of administrative convenience, designate roads, pipelines, streams, or other recognizable landmarks as arbitrary boundaries.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4129.

The board of supervisors of any county may provide by ordinance that the county elects to assume responsibility for the prevention and suppression of all fires on all land in the county, including lands within state responsibility areas when the Director of Forestry and Fire Protection concurs in accordance with criteria adopted by the State Board of Forestry and Fire Protection, but not including lands owned or controlled by the federal government or any agency of the federal government or lands within the exterior boundaries of any city. After the effective date of the contract referred to in Section 4133, the county shall exercise for the duration of the contract all the duty, power, authority, and responsibility for the prevention and suppression of all fires on all land in the county for which the county is authorized by this section to elect to assume responsibility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 972, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4129.1.

When the incorporation of a city removes land from a state responsibility area and the county continues to provide residential fire service for the newly incorporated city and remains under contract to provide fire service for the state responsibility area, the county shall, during the three years subsequent to incorporation, contract with the city to continue to provide fire service to the area removed from the state responsibility area under the same terms and conditions as under the state contract. The county may bill the newly incorporated city for actual revenue lost under the state contract because of removal of land from the state responsibility area during that period, but may not, during the three-year period, require the city to pay an amount greater than that apportioned for the affected area under the state contract.

If the budget of the department is revised to reflect the removal of the affected lands from a state responsibility area and payments to the county are accordingly reduced, the county may bill the newly incorporated city for the allocable decrease, or if the amount cannot be readily ascertained, the county may, after the effective date of the new budget, charge the city an amount equal to the total payment to the county divided by the total acres of the state responsibility area times the removed acres which are annexed to the city.

This section does not change any power, duty, or responsibility of the department. This section does not require the department to base its budget on per acre costs and does not impose any requirement that the department implement or design any formula or budget.

This section applies only in counties with a population greater than 8,000,000.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 340, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4130.

The board shall classify all lands within state responsibility areas into types of land based on cover, beneficial use of water from watersheds, probable damage from erosion, and fire risks and hazards, and shall determine the intensity of protection to be given to each such type of land. A plan for adequate statewide fire protection of state responsibility areas shall be prepared by the board in which all land of each type shall be assigned the same intensity of protection, and the estimated cost of such intensity of protection shall be determined.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4131.

In the preparation of budgets for fire protection, the total funds available or estimated to be available shall be allocated to the areas to be protected in conformance to such fire protection plan. If the funds available are less than the estimated adequate cost of such plan the board shall determine whether the intensities of fire protection shall be reduced or withdrawn, maintaining uniform consideration for all lands in each type.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4132.

In those counties assuming responsibility pursuant to Section 4129 for fire protection and suppression in the lands thus classified within the respective counties, there shall be budgeted sums to be allocated to those counties at least equal to the direct cost of fire protection which is determined pursuant to Section 4130 and which shall include the salaries and wages of suppression crews and lookouts and maintenance of firefighting facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4133.

The department shall, with the approval of the Department of General Services, for periods not to exceed three years, enter into a contract with any county which enacts an ordinance as provided in Section 4129. The budgeted sums in Section 4132 are subject to annual review in the budget process.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 194, Sec. 2.   Effective July 23, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

4134.

Any such contract shall provide for payment to such county, as compensation for the assumption of the duty, power, authority and responsibility for fire protection and suppression as provided in Section 4129 of such sum as may be specifically allocated in the appropriation made by the Legislature for that purpose or, if no specific appropriation is made for it, the sum allocated for expenditure in such county pursuant to Sections 4131 and 4132.
